Hawaii statutes.
§460J-2 Pest control board. (a) There
shall be a pest control board of nine members. Six members of the board shall
be appointed by the governor; of which four shall have been for a period of not
less than five years preceding the date of their appointment, licensed pest
control operators actively engaged in the business of pest control; and two
shall be public members. Three members of the board shall serve on an ex
officio, voting basis: the chairperson of the board of agriculture or the
chairperson's representative, the director of health or the director's
representative, and the chairperson of the department of plant and
environmental protection sciences of the college of tropical agriculture and
human resources of the University of Hawaii or the chairperson's
representative. No two members of the board shall be employed by or associated
with the same business firm engaged in pest control.

(b) Except for members of the board first
appointed, no one, except the ex officio and public members, shall be eligible
for appointment who does not at the time of the member's appointment hold a
valid and unexpired license to operate as a pest control operator. [L 1972, c
134, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; gen ch 1985; am L
1991, c 16, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §129; ree L 1993, c 322, §11; am L 2016, c
55, §16]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next